Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2973
Other considerations of directors.

Unless otherwise provided in the articles of organization or bylaws, a director, in determining the best interests of the limited cooperative association, may consider the interests of employees, customers, and suppliers of the limited cooperative association and of the communities in which the limited cooperative association operates and the long-term and short-term interests of the limited cooperative association and its members.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 73.